Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1945
Applicant or licensee; hearing; procedure;
director; decision; contents.

(1) If the applicant or licensee requests a hearing under
section 71-1944, the department shall hold a hearing and give the applicant
or licensee the right to present such evidence as may be proper. On the basis
of such evidence, the director shall affirm, modify, or set aside the determination.
A copy of such decision setting forth the findings of facts and the particular
reasons upon which the decision is based shall be sent by either registered
or certified mail to the applicant or licensee.

(2) The procedure
governing hearings authorized by this section shall be in accordance with
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department. A full and
complete record shall be kept of all proceedings. Witnesses may be subpoenaed
by either party and shall be allowed fees at a rate prescribed by rule and
regulation.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 22.